Washington statutes.
RCW 10.93.030

Reporting use of authority under this chapter.

The circumstances surrounding any actual exercise of peace officer authority under this chapter shall be timely reported, after the fact, to the Washington law enforcement agency with primary territorial jurisdiction and shall be subject to any reasonable reporting procedure which may be established by such agency.

[ 1985 c 89 s 3.]